Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Assignments.

§ 55.1-1406.
Grantees and assignees have same rights against lessees as lessors.

A grantee or assignee of any land leased, or of the reversion thereof, and his heirs, personal representative, or assigns, shall enjoy against the lessee, and his heirs, personal representative, or assigns, the like advantage, by action or entry for any forfeiture or by action upon any covenant or promise in the lease that the grantor, assignor, or lessor, or his heirs, might have enjoyed.

History.

2017, c. 730, § 55-217.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1407.
Lessees have same rights against grantees as against lessors.

A lessee, his personal representative, or his assigns may have against a grantee or alienee of the reversion, or of any part of such reversion, his heirs, or his assigns the like benefit of any condition, covenant, or promise in the lease as he could have had against the lessor himself and his heirs and assigns, except the benefit of any warranty, in deed or law.

History.

Code 1919, § 5513; Code 1950, § 55-218; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1408.
What powers to pass to grantee or devisee; when attornment unnecessary.

In conveyances or devises of rents in fee, with powers of distress and reentry, or either of them, such powers shall pass to the grantee or devisee without express words. A grant or devise of a rent, or of a reversion or remainder, is good and effectual without attornment of the tenant, but no tenant who, before notice of the grant, paid the rent to the grantor shall suffer any damage as a result of such payment.

History.

Code 1919, § 5514; Code 1950, § 55-220; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1409.
When attornment void.

The attornment of a tenant to any stranger is void, unless it is with the consent of the landlord of such tenant or pursuant to or in consequence of the judgment or order of a court.

History.

Code 1919, § 5515; Code 1950, § 55-221; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.